Illinois, session 104th, HB4770.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Credit Union Act is amended by 5changing Sections 15, 20, 26, 29, 30, and 59 and by adding 6Section 57.3 as follows: 7    (205 ILCS 305/15)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4416)8    Sec. 15. Membership defined. 9    (1) The membership of a credit union shall be limited to 10and consist of the subscribers to the articles of 11incorporation and such other persons within the common bond, 12as defined in this Act and as set forth in the credit union's 13articles of incorporation, as have been duly admitted members, 14have paid the required entrance fee or membership fee, or 15both, if any, have subscribed for one or more shares, and have 16paid the initial installment thereon, and have complied with 17such other requirements as the articles of incorporation or 18bylaws specify. Two or more persons within the common bond who 19have jointly subscribed for one or more shares under a joint 20account and have complied with all membership requirements may 21each be admitted to membership. The surviving spouse of a 22credit union member may, within 6 months of the member's 23death, become a member of the credit union by paying the   HB4770 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1required entrance fee or membership fee or both, if any, by 2subscribing for one or more shares and paying the initial 3installment thereon, and by complying with such other 4requirements as the articles of incorporation or bylaws 5specify. 6    (2) Any member may withdraw from a credit union at any time 7upon giving notice of withdrawal as required by the bylaws. 8    (3) Any member may be expelled by a 2/3 vote of the members 9present at any regular or special meeting called to consider 10the matter, but only after an opportunity has been given to the 11member to be heard. 12    (4) A member may be expelled by a majority vote of a quorum 13of directors if the board has adopted a policy providing for 14expulsion for any of the following acts committed by the 15member: 16        (i) causing a loss to the credit union;17        (ii) failing to maintain one or more shares at the 18    credit union;19        (iii) committing fraud or any similar misdeed against 20    the credit union;21        (iv) engaging in inappropriate behavior involving 22    another person, such as physical or verbal abuse of 23    another member or an employee of the credit union, while 24    transacting business with the credit union; or25        (v) otherwise violating board policy applicable to 26    members.   HB4770 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    In maintaining and enforcing a policy based on loss, the 2board may consider, without limitation, a member's failure to 3pay amounts due under a loan, failure to provide collected 4funds to cover withdrawals or personal share drafts or credit 5union drafts where the member is a remitter, or failure to pay 6fees or charges due the credit union. 7    The policy may delegate the expulsion authority to the 8senior management officials of the credit union. If a member 9is expelled by a senior management official of the credit 10union, the member may, within 30 days after the expulsion, 11seek reinstatement by appealing the action in writing to the 12board of directors of the credit union. The board may affirm, 13disaffirm, or modify the action, and the board's decision is 14final. As used in this subsection (4), "senior management 15official" includes the chief management officer of the credit 16union (including the person holding the title of President or 17Chief Executive Officer, or both, or Treasurer/Manager) and 18other management officers of the credit union (including, 19without limitation, the persons holding the title of Chief 20Operating Officer, Chief Financial Officer, Chief 21Administrative Officer, Chief Information Officer, Chief 22Security Officer, Chief Experience Officer, Chief Legal 23Officer, Executive Vice President, Senior Vice President, or 24Vice President). This list is an illustrative and not 25exhaustive list of management officers that qualify as senior 26management officials.   HB4770 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    If a policy is adopted by the board pursuant to this 2subsection (4), the policy shall be distributed not fewer than 330 days before the effective date of the policy by: (i) mailing 4it to each member of the credit union at the member's current 5address appearing on the records of the credit union; (ii) 6electronically delivering it to all members by posting it on 7the credit union's website; or (iii) disclosing it to all 8members in membership newsletters or account statements. In 9addition, new members shall be provided written notice of the 10policy prior to or upon applying for membership by using one of 11the distribution methods described in this subsection (4). 12    (5) All or any part of the amount paid on shares of a 13withdrawing member or expelled member with any declared 14dividends or interest on the date of withdrawal or expulsion 15must, after deducting all amounts due from the member to the 16credit union, be paid to him. The credit union may require not 17more than 60 days' written notice of intention to withdraw 18shares, but a notice of withdrawal does not entitle the member 19to any preferred or prior claim in the event of liquidation. 20Withdrawing or expelled members have no further rights in the 21credit union, but are not, by withdrawal or expulsion, 22released from any obligation they owe to the credit union. 23    (6) A member who has caused a loss to the credit union or 24has violated board policy applicable to members may be denied 25any or all credit union services in accordance with board 26policy, however, members who are denied services shall be   HB4770 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1allowed to maintain a share account and to vote on all issues 2put to a vote of the membership. 3    (7) If a member fails to maintain one fully paid share, the 4credit union, at its option, may permit the member to 5re-subscribe and pay for one or more shares within 30 days 6after the date the member failed to maintain one fully paid 7share, without affecting the member's status or rights as a 8member during that period. A member that fails to re-subscribe 9for at least one fully paid share within the 30-day period 10shall be automatically expelled from the credit union and 11treated as an expelled member under subsection (5) of this 12Section 15. 13(Source: P.A. 101-567, eff. 8-23-19.) 14    (205 ILCS 305/20)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4421)15    Sec. 20. Election or appointment of officials. 16    (1) The credit union shall be directed by a board of 17directors consisting of no less than 7 in number, to be elected 18at the annual meeting by and from the members. Directors shall 19hold office until the next annual meeting, unless their terms 20are staggered. Upon amendment of its bylaws, a credit union 21may divide the directors into 2 or 3 classes with each class as 22nearly equal in number as possible. The term of office of the 23directors of the first class shall expire at the first annual 24meeting after their election, that of the second class shall 25expire at the second annual meeting after their election, and   HB4770 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1that of the third class, if any, shall expire at the third 2annual meeting after their election. At each annual meeting 3after the classification, the number of directors equal to the 4number of directors whose terms expire at the time of the 5meeting shall be elected to hold office until the second 6succeeding annual meeting if there are 2 classes or until the 7third succeeding annual meeting if there are 3 classes. A 8director shall hold office for the term for which he or she is 9elected and until his or her successor is elected and 10qualified. 11    (1.5) Except as provided in subsection (1.10), in all 12elections for directors, every member has the right to vote, 13in person, by proxy, or by electronic record if approved by the 14board of directors, the number of shares owned by him, or in 15the case of a member other than a natural person, the member's 16one vote, for as many persons as there are directors to be 17elected, or to cumulate such shares, and give one candidate as 18many votes as the number of directors multiplied by the number 19of his shares equals, or to distribute them on the same 20principle among as many candidates as he may desire and the 21directors shall not be elected in any other manner. Shares 22held in a joint account owned by more than one member may be 23voted by any one of the members, however, the number of 24cumulative votes cast may not exceed a total equal to the 25number of shares multiplied by the number of directors to be 26elected. A majority of the shares entitled to vote shall be   HB4770 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1represented either in person or by proxy for the election of 2directors. Each director shall wholly take and subscribe to an 3oath that he will diligently and honestly perform his duties 4in administering the affairs of the credit union, that while 5he may delegate to another the performance of those 6administrative duties he is not thereby relieved from his 7responsibility for their performance, that he will not 8knowingly violate or permit to be violated any law applicable 9to the credit union, and that he is the owner of at least one 10share of the credit union.11    (1.10) Upon amendment of a credit union's bylaws, in all 12elections for directors, every member who is a natural person 13shall have the right to cast one vote, regardless of the number 14of his or her shares, in person, by proxy, or by electronic 15record if approved by the board of directors, for as many 16persons as there are directors to be elected. 17    (1.15) If the board of directors has adopted a policy 18addressing age eligibility standards on voting, holding 19office, or petitioning the board, then a credit union may 20require (i) that members be at least 18 years of age by the 21date of the meeting in order to vote at meetings of the 22members, sign nominating petitions, or sign petitions 23requesting special meetings, and (ii) that members be at least 2418 years of age by the date of election or appointment in order 25to hold elective or appointive office. 26    (2) The board of directors shall appoint from among the   HB4770 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1members of the credit union, a supervisory committee of not 2less than 3 members at the organization meeting and within 30 3days following each annual meeting of the members for such 4terms as the bylaws provide. Members of the supervisory 5committee may, but need not be, on the board of directors, but 6shall not be officers of the credit union.7    (3) The board of directors may appoint, from among the 8members of the credit union, a credit committee consisting of 9an odd number, not less than 3 for such terms as the bylaws 10provide. Members of the credit committee may, but need not be, 11directors or officers of the credit union.12    (4) The board of directors may appoint from among the 13members of the credit union a membership committee of one or 14more persons. If appointed, the committee shall act upon all 15applications for membership and submit a report of its actions 16to the board of directors at the next regular meeting for 17review. If no membership committee is appointed, credit union 18management shall act upon all applications for membership and 19submit a report of its actions to the board of directors at the 20next regular meeting for review.21    (5) The board of directors may appoint, from among the 22members of the credit union, a nominating committee of 3 or 23more persons. Members of the nominating committee may, but 24need not, be directors or officers of the credit union, but may 25not be members of the supervisory committee. The appointment, 26if made, shall be made in a timely manner to permit the   HB4770 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1nominating committee to recruit, evaluate, and nominate 2eligible candidates for each position to be filled in the 3election of directors or, in the event of a vacancy in office, 4to be filled by appointment of the board of directors for the 5remainder of the unexpired term of the director creating the 6vacancy. Factors the nominating committee may consider in 7evaluating prospective candidates include whether a candidate 8possesses or is willing to acquire through training the 9requisite skills and qualifications to carry out the statutory 10duties of a director. The board of directors may delegate to 11the nominating committee the recruitment, evaluation, and 12nomination of eligible candidates to serve on committees and 13in executive officer positions. 14    (6) The board of directors may create one or more other 15committees in addition to the committees identified in this 16Section and appoint directors or such other persons as the 17board designates to serve on the committee or committees. Any 18such committee shall serve at the pleasure of the board of 19directors and it shall not act on behalf of the credit union or 20bind it to any action, but it may make recommendations to the 21board of directors.22    (7)(a) The board of directors may appoint an individual as 23a registered agent for the credit union. The name of the 24registered agent appointed by the board of directors shall be 25identified in the annual report filed by the credit union on 26the annual report form supplied by the Department. The   HB4770 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1business office of the registered agent may, but is not 2required to, shall be the same as the principal place of 3business of the credit union. Any process, notice, or demand 4required or permitted by law to be served upon the credit union 5may be served upon the registered agent appointed by the 6credit union.7    (b) A credit union that has appointed a registered agent 8shall post on its website the name of its registered agent, the 9address of its principal place of business, and that the 10appointment was authorized by action of the board of 11directors.12    (c) A credit union that has appointed a registered agent 13may change its registered agent at any time by posting on its 14website a statement setting forth the following:15        (i) the address of its principal place of business,16        (ii) the name of its existing registered agent,17        (iii) the name of its successor registered agent, and18        (iv) that the change was authorized by action of the 19    board of directors.20    (d) A registered agent may resign at any time by 21submitting written notice thereof to the credit union at its 22principal place of business. The notice shall set forth the 23following:24        (i) the name of the credit union for which the 25    registered agent is acting,26        (ii) the address of the principal place of business of   HB4770 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    the credit union,2        (iii) the name of the registered agent,3        (iv) that the registered agent is resigning, and4        (v) the effective date of the resignation, which shall 5    not be less than 30 days after the date of filing of the 6    notice. 7    (8) The use of electronic records for member voting 8pursuant to this Section shall employ a security procedure 9that meets the attribution criteria set forth in Section 9 of 10the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act. 11    (9) As used in this Section, "electronic", "electronic 12record", and "security procedure" have the meanings ascribed 13to those terms in the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.14(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 15102-774, eff. 5-13-22; 102-858, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 166-30-23; 103-289, eff. 7-28-23.) 17    (205 ILCS 305/26)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4427)18    Sec. 26. Executive officers. 19    (1) At their first meeting, the board of directors shall 20elect from among their own number executive officers 21consisting of a chairman of the board and one or more vice 22chairmen, a secretary, and a treasurer. The directors shall 23appoint a chief management official who shall have such title 24as the directors shall determine. The directors and the chief 25management official may also appoint one or more vice   HB4770 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1presidents and other officers. The chief management official, 2and vice presidents, and other officers president may, but 3need not, be directors. Any two or more offices may be held by 4the same person, except the chairman of the board may not also 5hold the office of vice chairman or secretary.6    (2) The executive officers shall serve for a term of one 7year, or until their successors are chosen and have been duly 8qualified.9    (3) The duties of the executive officers shall be 10prescribed in the bylaws. Compensation of the executive 11officers shall be such as may be established by the directors 12from time to time.13(Source: P.A. 97-133, eff. 1-1-12.) 14    (205 ILCS 305/29)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4430)15    Sec. 29. Meetings of directors. 16    (1) The board of directors and the executive committee 17shall meet as often as necessary, but one body must meet at 18least monthly and the other at least quarterly, as prescribed 19in the bylaws. Unless a greater number is required by the 20bylaws, a majority of the whole board of directors shall 21constitute a quorum. The act of a majority of the directors 22present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the 23act of the board of directors unless the act of a greater 24number is required by this Act, the credit union's articles of 25incorporation or the bylaws.  HB4770 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    (1.5) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in 2subsection (1), the board of directors of a credit union with a 3composite rating of either 1 or 2 under the Uniform Financial 4Institutions Rating System known as the CAMELS supervisory 5rating system (or an equivalent rating under a comparable 6rating system) and a management rating under such composite 7rating of either 1 or 2 may meet not less than 6 times 8annually, with at least one meeting held during each fiscal 9quarter. This meeting frequency schedule shall be available to 10an eligible credit union irrespective of whether it has 11appointed an executive committee pursuant to Section 28. 12    (1.7) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (1.5), the board 13of directors of a credit union with $50,000,000 or more in 14assets, a composite rating of either 1 or 2 under the Uniform 15Financial Institutions Rating System known as the CAMELS 16supervisory rating system (or an equivalent rating under a 17comparable rating system), and a management rating under the 18composite rating of either 1 or 2 may meet no fewer than 4 19times annually, with at least one meeting held during each 20fiscal quarter. The board of directors of a credit union with 21less than $50,000,000 in assets, but with the composite and 22management ratings referenced in this subsection, may meet no 23fewer than 4 times annually, with at least one meeting held 24during each fiscal quarter, upon prior written approval of the 25Secretary. The meeting frequency schedule set forth in this 26subsection shall be available to an eligible credit union,   HB4770 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1irrespective of whether it has appointed an executive 2committee pursuant to Section 28. 3    (2) Unless specifically prohibited by the articles of 4incorporation or bylaws, directors and committee members may 5participate in and act at any meeting of the board or committee 6through the use of a conference telephone or other 7communications equipment by means of which all persons 8participating in the meeting can communicate with each other. 9Participation in the meeting shall constitute attendance and 10presence in person at the meeting of the person or persons so 11participating.12    (3) Unless specifically prohibited by the articles of 13incorporation or bylaws, any action required by this Act to be 14taken at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee and 15any other action that may be taken at a meeting of the board of 16directors or a committee may be taken without a meeting if a 17consent in writing setting forth the action taken is signed by 18all the directors entitled to vote with respect to the subject 19matter thereof, or by all members of the committee, as the case 20may be. The consent shall be evidenced by one or more written 21approvals, each of which sets forth the action taken and bears 22the signatures of one or more directors or committee members. 23All the approvals evidencing the consent shall be delivered to 24the secretary to be filed in the corporate records of the 25credit union. The action taken shall be effective when all the 26directors or committee members have approved the consent   HB4770 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1unless the consent specifies a different effective date. A 2consent signed by all the directors or all the members of a 3committee shall have the same effect as a unanimous vote, and 4may be stated as such in any document filed with the director 5under this Act.6    (3.5)(a) The secretary, as an executive officer of the 7credit union elected by the board of directors pursuant to 8subsection (1) of Section 26, or a recording secretary duly 9appointed by the board of directors to act on behalf of the 10secretary, shall prepare and maintain minutes of all meetings 11of the members and the board of directors. The secretary or 12recording secretary shall sign the minutes for the limited 13purpose of authenticating them as an accurate description of 14the information presented and action taken at the subject 15meeting. The signature shall not constitute approval of the 16minutes.17    (b) The chairman may, but is not required to, sign the 18minutes of any such meeting of the membership or board of 19directors. In the event the chairman signs the minutes, that 20signature shall not constitute approval of the minutes.21    (c) Pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 27, the board of 22directors is charged with and has control over the general 23management of the operations, funds, and records of the credit 24union, and the minutes, as compliance review documents of the 25credit union under paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this 26Section 29, shall only be deemed final and binding upon the   HB4770 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1approval by a majority vote of the directors present at a 2meeting at which a quorum is present, or by unanimous action 3without a meeting.4    (d) Minutes of membership meetings require approval by a 5majority of the membership present at a meeting at which a 6quorum is present. 7    (4)(a) As used in this subsection:8    "Affiliate" means an organization established to serve the 9needs of credit unions, the business of which relates to the 10daily operations of credit unions.11    "Compliance review documents" means reports, meeting 12minutes, and other documents prepared in connection with a 13review or evaluation conducted by or for the board of 14directors.15    (b) This subsection applies to the board of directors in 16relation to its functions to evaluate and seek to improve any 17of the following:18        (i) loan policies or underwriting standards;19        (ii) asset quality;20        (iii) financial reporting to federal or State 21    governmental or regulatory agencies; or22        (iv) compliance with federal or State statutory or 23    regulatory requirements, including, without limitation, 24    the manner in which it performs its duties under Section 25    30.26    (c) Meetings, minutes of meetings, and reports of the   HB4770 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1board of directors shall be subject to the confidentiality and 2redaction standards set forth in this subsection.3    (d) Except as provided in paragraph (e), compliance review 4documents and the deliberations of the board of directors are 5confidential. An affiliate of a credit union, a credit union 6regulatory agency, and the insurer of credit union share 7accounts shall have access to compliance review documents; 8however, (i) the documents remain confidential and (ii) 9delivery of compliance review documents to an affiliate or 10pursuant to the requirements of a credit union regulatory 11agency or an insurer of credit union share accounts do not 12constitute a waiver of the confidentiality granted in this 13Section.14    (e) This Section does not apply to any civil or 15administrative action initiated by a credit union regulatory 16agency or an insurer of credit union share accounts.17    (f) This Section shall not be construed to limit the 18discovery or admissibility in any civil action of any 19documents, including compliance review documents.20    (g) Any report required under this Act to be furnished to 21the board of directors by the membership committee, credit 22committee, or any other committee may be submitted in a 23summary format that redacts personally identifiable 24information as defined under applicable State and federal law. 25    (h) Compliance review documents may be disclosed by the 26Secretary or a credit union to any person or entity to whom   HB4770 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1confidential supervisory information may be disclosed pursuant 2to subsection (3) of Section 9.1. 3(Source: P.A. 103-289, eff. 7-28-23; 104-403, eff. 1-1-26.) 4    (205 ILCS 305/30)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4431)5    Sec. 30. Duties of directors. 6    (a) It shall be the duty of the directors to:7        (1) Review actions on applications for membership. A 8    record of the membership committee's approval or denial of 9    membership or management's approval or denial of 10    membership if no membership committee has been appointed 11    shall be available to the board of directors for 12    inspection. A person denied membership by the membership 13    committee or credit union management may appeal the denial 14    to the board;15        (2) Provide adequate fidelity bond coverage for 16    officers, employees, directors and committee members, and 17    for losses caused by persons outside of the credit union, 18    subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the 19    Secretary;20        (3) Determine from time to time the interest rates, 21    not in excess of that allowed under this Act, which shall 22    be charged on loans to members and to authorize interest 23    refunds, if any, to members from income earned and 24    received in proportion to the interest paid by them on 25    such classes of loans and under such conditions as the   HB4770 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    board prescribes. The directors may establish different 2    interest rates to be charged on different classes of 3    loans;4        (4) Within any limitations set forth in the credit 5    union's bylaws, fix the maximum amount which may be loaned 6    with and without security to a member;7        (5) Declare dividends on various classes of shares in 8    the manner and form as provided in the bylaws;9        (6) Limit the number of shares which may be owned by a 10    member; such limitations to apply alike to all members;11        (7) Have charge of the investment of funds, except 12    that the board of directors may designate an investment 13    committee or any qualified individual or entity to have 14    charge of making investments under policies established by 15    the board of directors;16        (8) Authorize the employment of or contracting with 17    such persons or organizations as may be necessary to carry 18    on the operations of the credit union, provided that prior 19    approval is received from the Department before delegating 20    substantially all managerial duties and responsibilities 21    to a credit union organization, and fix the compensation, 22    if any, of the officers and provide for compensation for 23    other employees within policies established by the board 24    of directors;25        (9) Authorize the conveyance of property;26        (10) Borrow or lend money consistent with the   HB4770 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    provisions of this Act;2        (11) Designate a depository or depositories for the 3    funds of the credit union and supervise the investment of 4    funds;5        (12) Suspend or remove, or both, any or all officers 6    or any or all members of the membership, credit, or other 7    committees whenever, in the judgment of the board of 8    directors, the best interests of the credit union will be 9    served thereby; provided that members of the supervisory 10    committee may not be suspended or removed except for 11    failure to perform their duties; and provided that removal 12    of any officer shall be without prejudice to the contract 13    rights, if any, of the person so removed;14        (13) Appoint any special committees deemed necessary; 15    and16        (14) Perform such other duties as the members may 17    direct, and perform or authorize any action not 18    inconsistent with this Act and not specifically reserved 19    by the bylaws to the members.20    (b) The board of directors may delegate to the chief 21management official, according to guidelines established by 22the board that may include the authority to further delegate 23one or more duties, all of the following duties:24        (1) determining the interest rates on loans;25        (2) determining the dividend rates on share accounts; 26    and  HB4770 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1        (3) hiring employees other than the chief management 2    official, including, without limitation, vice presidents 3    and other officers, and fixing their title, grade, and 4    compensation. 5    (c) Each director shall have a working familiarity with 6basic finance and accounting practices consistent with the 7size and complexity of the credit union operation they serve, 8including the ability to read and understand the credit 9union's balance sheet and income and expense statements and 10the ability to ask, when appropriate, substantive questions of 11management and auditors. For the purposes of this subsection 12(c), substantive questions include queries concerning 13financial services and products offered to the membership; how 14those activities generate revenue for the credit union; the 15credit, liquidity, interest rate, compliance, strategic, 16transaction, and reputation risks associated with those 17activities; and the internal control structures maintained by 18the credit union that limit and manage those risks.19    A director who was elected or appointed on or after 20January 1, 2015 and who comes to the position without the 21requisite financial skills shall have until 6 months after the 22date of election or appointment to acquire the enumerated 23skills.24    An incumbent director who was elected or appointed before 25January 1, 2015 and does not possess the requisite financial 26skills shall have until July 1, 2015 to acquire the enumerated   HB4770 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1skills.2    An incumbent director or a director who is elected or 3appointed on or after January 1, 2015 who already understands 4his or her credit union's financial statements shall not be 5required to do anything further to satisfy the financial 6skills requirement set forth in subsection (c).7    It is the intent of the Department that all credit union 8directors possess a basic understanding of their credit 9union's financial condition. It is not the intent of the 10Department to subject credit union directors to examiner 11scrutiny of their financial skills. Rather, the Department 12shall evaluate whether the credit union has in place a policy 13to make available to their directors appropriate training to 14enhance their financial knowledge of the credit union. 15Directors may receive the training through internal credit 16union training, external training offered by the credit 17union's retained auditors, trade associations, vendors, 18regulatory agencies, or any other sources or on-the-job 19experience, or a combination of those activities. The training 20may be received through any medium, including, but not limited 21to, conferences, workshops, audit closing meetings, seminars, 22teleconferences, webinars, and other internet based delivery 23channels. 24(Source: P.A. 97-133, eff. 1-1-12; 98-784, eff. 7-24-14.) 25    (205 ILCS 305/57.3 new)  HB4770 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    Sec. 57.3. Digital asset services.2    (a) For purposes of this Section, the terms "covered 3person", "digital asset", "digital asset business activity", 4and "service provider" have the meanings given to those terms 5in the Digital Assets and Consumer Protection Act.6    (b) A credit union may establish relationships with 7covered persons and service providers in connection with the 8offering or provision by those covered persons or service 9providers of a digital asset business activity to enable the 10members of the credit union to hold, buy, and sell digital 11assets. The credit union shall have the authority to perform 12administrative functions related to digital asset business 13activity to facilitate digital asset transactions between its 14members and covered persons and service providers.15    (c) A credit union must exercise appropriate due diligence 16in selecting a covered person or service provider with whom to 17do business, and the written agreement between the credit 18union and covered person or service provider must address:19        (1) the features of the digital asset program;20        (2) the responsibilities and duties of the covered 21    person or service provider and credit union under the 22    program;23        (3) the confidentiality, security, disclosure, and 24    processing of credit union member information;25        (4) the applicable reporting and termination 26    provisions; and  HB4770 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1        (5) compliance with the requirements of all applicable 2    laws.3    (d) When marketing or advertising digital assets, digital 4asset business activities conducted by covered persons or 5service providers, and related administrative functions to the 6members of the credit union, the members shall be informed 7that the digital assets:8        (1) are not federally insured or insured by any other 9    insurer approved by the Secretary;10        (2) are not guaranteed by the credit union;11        (3) are or may be speculative and volatile;12        (4) may have associated fees;13        (5) may not allow member recourse; and14        (6) are or are not being offered by a third party. 15    (205 ILCS 305/59)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4460)16    Sec. 59. Investment of funds. 17    (a) Funds not used in loans to members may be invested, 18pursuant to subsection (7) of Section 30 of this Act, and 19subject to Departmental rules and regulations: 20        (1) In securities, obligations or other instruments of 21    or issued by or fully guaranteed as to principal and 22    interest by the United States of America or any agency 23    thereof or in any trust or trusts established for 24    investing directly or collectively in the same; 25        (2) In obligations of any state of the United States,   HB4770 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, 2    and the several territories organized by Congress, or any 3    political subdivision thereof; however, a credit union may 4    not invest more than 10% of its unimpaired capital and 5    surplus in the obligations of one issuer, exclusive of 6    general obligations of the issuer, and investments in 7    municipal securities must be limited to securities rated 8    in one of the 4 highest rating investment grades by a 9    nationally recognized statistical rating organization; 10        (3) In certificates of deposit or passbook type 11    accounts issued by a state or national bank, mutual 12    savings bank or savings and loan association; provided 13    that such institutions have their accounts insured by the 14    Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal 15    Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation; but provided, 16    further, that a credit union's investment in an account in 17    any one institution may exceed the insured limit on 18    accounts; 19        (4) In shares, classes of shares or share certificates 20    of other credit unions, including, but not limited to, 21    corporate credit unions; provided that such credit unions 22    have their members' accounts insured by the NCUA or other 23    approved insurers, and that if the members' accounts are 24    so insured, a credit union's investment may exceed the 25    insured limit on accounts; 26        (5) In shares of a cooperative society organized under   HB4770 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    the laws of this State or the laws of the United States in 2    the total amount not exceeding 10% of the unimpaired 3    capital and surplus of the credit union; provided that 4    such investment shall first be approved by the Department; 5        (6) In obligations of the State of Israel, or 6    obligations fully guaranteed by the State of Israel as to 7    payment of principal and interest; 8        (7) In shares, stocks or obligations of other 9    financial institutions in the total amount not exceeding 10    5% of the unimpaired capital and surplus of the credit 11    union; 12        (8) In federal funds and bankers' acceptances; 13        (9) In shares or stocks of Credit Union Service 14    Organizations in the total amount not exceeding the 15    greater of 6% of the unimpaired capital and surplus of the 16    credit union or the amount authorized for federal credit 17    unions; 18        (10) In corporate bonds identified as investment grade 19    by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating 20    organization, provided that: 21            (i) the board of directors has established a 22        written policy that addresses corporate bond 23        investment procedures and how the credit union will 24        manage credit risk, interest rate risk, liquidity 25        risk, and concentration risk; and26            (ii) the credit union has documented in its   HB4770 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1        records that a credit analysis of a particular 2        investment and the issuing entity was conducted by the 3        credit union, a third party on behalf of the credit 4        union qualified by education or experience to assess 5        the risk characteristics of corporate bonds, or a 6        nationally recognized statistical rating agency before 7        purchasing the investment and the analysis is updated 8        at least annually for as long as it holds the 9        investment; 10        (11) To aid in the credit union's management of its 11    assets, liabilities, and liquidity in the purchase of an 12    investment interest in a pool of loans, in whole or in part 13    and without regard to the membership of the borrowers, 14    from other depository institutions and financial type 15    institutions, including mortgage banks, finance companies, 16    insurance companies, and other loan sellers, subject to 17    such safety and soundness standards, limitations, and 18    qualifications as the Department may establish by rule or 19    guidance from time to time; 20        (12) To aid in the credit union's management of its 21    assets, liabilities, and liquidity by receiving funds from 22    another financial institution as evidenced by certificates 23    of deposit, share certificates, or other classes of shares 24    issued by the credit union to the financial institution;25        (13) In the purchase and assumption of assets held by 26    other financial institutions, with approval of the   HB4770 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    Secretary and subject to any safety and soundness 2    standards, limitations, and qualifications as the 3    Department may establish by rule or guidance from time to 4    time; 5        (14) In the shares, stocks, or obligations of 6    community development financial institutions as defined in 7    regulations issued by the U.S. Department of the Treasury 8    and minority depository institutions as defined by the 9    National Credit Union Administration; however the 10    aggregate amount of all such investments shall not at any 11    time exceed 5% of the paid-in and unimpaired capital and 12    surplus of the credit union; 13        (15)(A) In shares, stocks, or member units of 14    financial technology companies in the total amount not 15    exceeding 2.5% of the net worth of the credit union, so 16    long as: 17            (i) the credit union would remain well capitalized 18        as defined by 12 CFR 702.102 if the credit union 19        reduced its net worth by the full investment amount at 20        the time the investment is made or at any point during 21        the time the investment is held by the credit union;22            (ii) the credit union and the financial technology 23        company are operated in a manner that demonstrates to 24        the public the separate corporate existence of the 25        credit union and financial technology company; and26            (iii) the credit union has received a composite   HB4770 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1        rating of 1 or 2 under the CAMELS supervisory rating 2        system. 3        (B) The investment limit in subparagraph (A) of this 4    paragraph (15) is increased to 5% of the net worth of the 5    credit union if it has received a management rating of 1 6    under the CAMELS supervisory rating system at the time a 7    specific investment is made and at all times during the 8    term of the investment. A credit union that satisfies the 9    criteria in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (15) and 10    this subparagraph may request approval from the Secretary 11    for an exception to the 5% limit up to a limit of 10% of 12    the net worth of the credit union, subject to such safety 13    and soundness standards, limitations, and qualifications 14    as the Department may establish by rule or guidance from 15    time to time. The request shall be in writing and 16    substantiate the need for the higher limit, describe the 17    credit union's record of investment activity, and include 18    financial statements reflecting a sound fiscal history. 19        (C) Before investing in a financial technology 20    company, the credit union shall obtain a written legal 21    opinion as to whether the financial technology company is 22    established in a manner that will limit potential exposure 23    of the credit union to no more than the loss of funds 24    invested in the financial technology company and the legal 25    opinion shall:26            (i) address factors that have led courts to   HB4770 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1        "pierce the corporate veil", such as inadequate 2        capitalization, lack of separate corporate identity, 3        common boards of directors and employees, control of 4        one entity over another, and lack of separate books 5        and records; and6            (ii) be provided by independent legal counsel of 7        the credit union.8        (D) Before investing in the financial technology 9    company, the credit union shall enter into a written 10    investment agreement with the financial technology company 11    and the agreement shall contain the following clauses:12            (i) the financial technology company will: (I) 13        provide the Department with access to the books and 14        records of the financial technology company relating 15        to the investment made by the credit union, with the 16        costs of examining those records borne by the credit 17        union in accordance with the per diem rate established 18        by the Department by rule; (II) follow generally 19        accepted accounting principles; and (III) provide the 20        credit union with its financial statements on at least 21        a quarterly basis and certified public accountant 22        audited financial statements on an annual basis; and23            (ii) the financial technology company and credit 24        union agree to terminate their contractual 25        relationship: (I) upon 90 days' written notice to the 26        parties by the Secretary that the safety and soundness   HB4770 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1        of the credit union is threatened pursuant to the 2        Department's cease and desist and suspension authority 3        in Sections 8 and 61; (II) upon 30 days' written notice 4        to the parties if the credit union's net worth ratio 5        falls below the level that classifies it as well 6        capitalized as defined by 12 CFR 702.102; and (III) 7        immediately upon the parties' receipt of written 8        notice from the Secretary when the Secretary 9        reasonably concludes, based upon specific facts set 10        forth in the notice to the parties, that the credit 11        union will suffer immediate, substantial, and 12        irreparable injury or loss if it remains a party to the 13        investment agreement.14        (E) The termination of the investment agreement 15    between the financial technology company and credit union 16    shall in no way operate to relieve the financial 17    technology company from repaying the investment or other 18    obligation due and owing the credit union at the time of 19    termination.20        (F) Any financial technology company in which a credit 21    union invests pursuant to this paragraph (15) that 22    directly or indirectly originates, purchases, facilitates, 23    brokers, or services loans to consumers in Illinois shall 24    not charge an interest rate that exceeds the applicable 25    maximum rate established by the Board of the National 26    Credit Union Administration pursuant to 12 CFR   HB4770 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    701.21(c)(7)(iii)-(iv). The maximum interest rate 2    described in this subparagraph that may be charged by a 3    financial technology company applies to all consumer loans 4    and consumer credit products; and 5        (16) In derivatives transactions, to aid in the credit 6    union's management of interest rate risk. Before entering 7    into a derivatives transaction, and at all times during 8    its management of a derivatives transactions program, a 9    credit union shall satisfy and comply with all the 10    requirements set forth in 12 CFR 703.101 et seq. All 11    definitional terms and operational standards shall have 12    the meanings given to them in 12 CFR 703.101 et seq., 13    except references to federal credit unions shall be 14    construed to mean Illinois-chartered credit unions, and 15    references to the National Credit Union Administration and 16    Regional Director shall be respectfully construed to mean 17    the Department and the Secretary. A credit union with 18    assets of at least $500 million and a CAMELS management 19    component rating of 1 or 2 need not obtain prior approval 20    from the Department before engaging in derivative 21    transactions but shall notify the Secretary in writing or 22    by electronic mail within 5 business days after entering 23    into its first derivatives transaction; and .24        (17) In commercial mortgage related securities and 25    collateralized mortgage obligations to aid in the credit 26    union's management of its assets, liabilities, and   HB4770 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    liquidity. Before entering into a transaction to purchase 2    a commercial mortgage related security or investing in a 3    collateralized mortgage obligation and at all times during 4    its management of the purchase or investment, a credit 5    union shall satisfy and comply with the requirements set 6    forth in 12 CFR 703.6 and 703.14 and applicable rules 7    adopted by the Secretary. For the purposes of this 8    paragraph, all definitional terms and operational 9    standards shall have the meanings given to them in 12 CFR 10    703.6 and 703.14, except references to federal credit 11    unions shall be construed to mean Illinois-chartered 12    credit unions.13    (b) As used in this Section: 14    "Political subdivision" includes, but is not limited to, 15counties, townships, cities, villages, incorporated towns, 16school districts, educational service regions, special road 17districts, public water supply districts, fire protection 18districts, drainage districts, levee districts, sewer 19districts, housing authorities, park districts, and any 20agency, corporation, or instrumentality of a state or its 21political subdivisions, whether now or hereafter created and 22whether herein specifically mentioned or not.23    "Financial institution" includes any bank, savings bank, 24savings and loan association, or credit union established 25under the laws of the United States, this State, or any other 26state.   HB4770 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1    "Financial technology company" includes any corporation, 2partnership, limited liability company, or other entity 3organized under the laws of Illinois, another state, or the 4United States of America: 5        (1) that the principal business of which is the 6    provision of financial products or financial services, or 7    both, that:8            (i) currently relate or may prospectively relate 9        to the daily operations of credit unions;10            (ii) are of current or prospective benefit to the 11        members of credit unions; or12            (iii) are of current or prospective benefit to 13        consumers eligible for membership in credit unions; 14        and15        (2) that applies technological interventions, 16    including, without limitation, specialized software or 17    algorithm processes, products, or solutions, to improve 18    and automate the delivery and use of those financial 19    products or financial services. 20    (c) A credit union investing to fund an employee benefit 21plan obligation is not subject to the investment limitations 22of this Act and this Section and may purchase an investment 23that would otherwise be impermissible if the investment is 24directly related to the credit union's obligation under the 25employee benefit plan and the credit union holds the 26investment only for so long as it has an actual or potential   HB4770 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 19646 BAB 33095 b1obligation under the employee benefit plan. 2    (d) If a credit union acquires loans from another 3financial institution or financial-type institution pursuant 4to this Section, the credit union shall be authorized to 5provide loan servicing and collection services in connection 6with those loans. 7(Source: P.A. 102-496, eff. 8-20-21; 102-774, eff. 5-13-22; 8102-858, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-1034, eff. 98-9-24.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.